California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(A) The price of gas expressed in a format that makes it possible for core gas customers to compare and select among similar products and services on a standard basis. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this subdivision. The commission shall require disclosure of the total price of gas on a cents-per-therm basis, including the costs of all gas services and charges regulated by the commission. The commission shall also require estimates of the total monthly bill for the gas service at varying consumption levels, including the costs of all gas services and charges regulated by the commission. In determining these rules, the commission may consider alternatives to the cents-per-therm disclosure if other information would provide the customer with sufficient information to compare among alternatives on a standard basis.

(B) Separate disclosure of all recurring and nonrecurring charges associated with the sale of gas.

(C) If services other than gas are offered, an itemization of the services and the charge or charges associated with each.

(2) A description of the potential customer’s right to rescind the contract without fee or penalty as described in Section 989.1.

(3) An explanation of the customer’s financial obligations, as well as the procedures regarding past due payments, discontinuance of service, billing disputes, and service complaints.

(4) The core transport agent’s registration number, if applicable.

(5) The right to change service providers upon written notice, including disclosure of any fees or penalties assessed by the supplier for early termination of a contract.

(6) A description of the availability of low-income assistance programs for qualified customers and how customers can apply for these programs.

(b) The commission may assist core transport agents in developing the notice. The commission may suggest inclusion of additional information it deems necessary for the consumer protection
 purposes of this section. On at least a semiannual basis, a core transport agent shall provide the commission with a copy of the form of notice included in its standard service plans made available to core gas customers as described in subdivision (a) of Section 984.5.

(c) Any core transport agent offering gas services who declines to provide those services to a consumer shall, upon request of the consumer, disclose to that consumer the reason for the denial in writing within 30 days. At the time service is denied, the core transport agent shall disclose to the consumer his or her right to make this request. Consumers shall have at least 30 days from the date service is denied to make the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

987.

(a) The commission shall maintain a list of core gas customers who do not wish to be solicited by telephone, by a gas corporation, marketer, broker, or aggregator for gas service, to subscribe to or change their core transport agent. The commission shall not assess a charge for inclusion of a customer on the list. The list shall be updated periodically, but no less than quarterly.

(b) The list shall include sufficient information for gas corporations, marketers, brokers, or aggregators of gas service to identify customers who do not wish to be solicited, including a customer’s address and telephone number. The list shall be made accessible electronically from the commission to any party regulated as a gas corporation or
 registered with the commission as an electric marketer, broker, or aggregator of gas service.

(c) A gas corporation, marketer, broker, or aggregator of gas service shall not solicit, by telephone, any customer on the list prepared pursuant to subdivision (a). Any gas corporation, marketer, broker, or aggregator of gas service, or the representative of a gas corporation, marketer, broker, or aggregator of gas service, who solicits any customer on the list prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) more than once shall be liable to the customer for twenty-five dollars ($25) for each contact in violation of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 153.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

988.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, requirements placed on a core transport agent shall not apply to gas services provided by a local publicly owned gas utility to customers within the jurisdiction or service territory of that local publicly owned gas utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

989.

Unclaimed refunds ordered by the commission, and any accrued interest, may be used by the commission to fund additional consumer protection efforts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

989.1.

(a) In addition to any other right to revoke an offer, core gas customers of gas service, have the right to cancel a contract for gas service until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the buyer signs an agreement or offer to purchase.

(b) Cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of cancellation to the seller at the address specified in the agreement or offer.

(c) Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is effective when deposited in the mail properly addressed with postage
 prepaid.

(d) Notice of cancellation given by the buyer need not take the particular form as provided with the contract or offer to purchase and, however expressed, is effective if it indicates the intention of the buyer not to be bound by the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

989.5.

(a) A consumer damaged by a violation of this chapter by a core transport agent is entitled to recover all of the following:

(1) Actual damages.

(2) The consumer’s reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

(3) Exemplary damages, in the amount the court deems proper, for intentional or willful violations.

(4) Equitable relief as the court deems proper.

(b) The rights, remedies, and penalties established by this chapter are in addition to the rights, remedies, or penalties established under any other law.

(c) This chapter does not abrogate any authority of the Attorney General to enforce existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Certificates of Public Convenience and Necessity [1001. - 1103.]



  ARTICLE 1. Specified Utilities [1001. - 1013.]

1001.

(a) A railroad corporation whose railroad is operated primarily by electricity, street railroad corporation, gas corporation, electrical corporation, telegraph corporation, telephone corporation, water corporation, or sewer system corporation shall not begin the construction of a street railroad, of a line, plant, or system, or of any extension thereof, without having first obtained from the commission a certificate that the present or future public convenience and necessity require or will require its construction.

(b) The extension, expansion, upgrade, or other modification of an existing electrical transmission facility, including transmission
 lines and substations, does not require a certificate that the present or future public convenience and necessity requires or will require its construction.

(c) This article does not require those corporations to secure that certificate for an extension within any city or city and county within which it has lawfully commenced operations, for an extension into territory either within or without a city or city and county contiguous to its street railroad, line, plant, or system, and not served by a public utility of like character, or for an extension within or to territory already served by it, necessary in the ordinary course of its business. If any public utility, in constructing or extending its line, plant, or system, interferes or is about to interfere with the operation of the line, plant, or system of any other public utility or of
 the water system of a public agency, already constructed, the commission, on complaint of the public utility or public agency claiming to be injuriously affected, may, after hearing, make an order and prescribe terms and conditions for the location of the lines, plants, or systems affected as to it may seem just and reasonable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 357, Sec. 2.   (SB 529)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.1.

In a proceeding evaluating the issuance of a certificate of public convenience and necessity for a proposed transmission project, the commission shall establish a rebuttable presumption with regard to need for the proposed transmission project in favor of an Independent System Operator governing board-approved need evaluation if all of the following are satisfied:

(a) The Independent System Operator governing board has made explicit findings regarding the need for the proposed transmission project and has determined that the proposed project is the most cost-effective transmission solution.

(b) The Independent System Operator is a party to the proceeding.

(c) The Independent System Operator governing board-approved need evaluation is submitted to the commission within sufficient time to be included within the scope of the proceeding.

(d) There has been no substantial change to the scope, estimated cost, or timeline of the proposed transmission project as approved by the Independent System Operator governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 10.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.5.

(a) The commission shall exempt the construction of any line, plant, or system, or extension thereof, located outside the boundaries of the state from the requirements of Section 1001, upon the application of the public utility constructing that line, plant, or system, or extension thereof, if the public utility derives 75 percent or more of its operating revenues from outside the state, as recorded in the fiscal period immediately before the filing of the application, unless the commission determines that the public interest requires that the construction should not be exempt from Section 1001.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the commission shall make the determination denying the exemption, as specified in subdivision (a), within 90 days after the public utility files the application for exemption with the commission. If the commission fails to make this determination within that 90-day period, the construction of that line, plant, or system, or extension thereof, is exempt from the requirements of Section 1001.

(c) The commission and the public utility filing the application for exemption may, if both agree, extend the time period within which the commission is required to make the determination denying the exemption, for not more than an additional 60 days after the expiration of the 90-day period specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 971, Sec. 2.   Effective September 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

(a) The commission, as a basis for granting any certificate pursuant to Section 1001 shall give consideration to the following factors:

(1) Community values.

(2) Recreational and park areas.

(3) Historical and aesthetic values.

(4) Influence on environment, except that in the case of any line, plant, or system or extension thereof located in another state which will be subject to
 environmental impact review pursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (Chapter 55 (commencing with Section 4321) of Title 42 of the United States Code) or similar state laws in the other state, the commission shall not consider influence on the environment unless any emissions or discharges therefrom would have a significant influence on the environment of this state.

(b) With respect to any thermal powerplant or electrical transmission line for which a certificate is required pursuant to the provisions of Division 15 (commencing with Section 25000) of the Public Resources Code, no certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be granted pursuant to Section 1001 without such other certificate having been obtained first, and the decision granting such other certificate shall be conclusive as to all matters determined thereby and shall take the place of the requirement for consideration by the commission of the four
 factors specified in subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 573, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.4.

(a) The commission may, by resolution, adopt successor guidelines to the commission’s Guidelines for Energy Project Applications Requiring CEQA Compliance: Pre-filing and Proponent’s Environmental Assessments (November 2019) at a publicly noticed meeting to address its receipt and review of and actions on applications for the construction of electrical transmission facilities subject to its regulatory jurisdiction. These guidelines shall be designed to mitigate ratepayer costs, lessen the uncertainty of the submittal process, and improve the commission’s review process by increasing applicant understanding of applicable requirements
 with the intent of advancing the timely resolution of the construction of the facilities and efficient disposition of the applications.

(b) To the extent there is a conflict or inconsistency between the content in the guidelines adopted or revised pursuant to this section and a commission rule of practice or procedure addressing the completeness of applications for electrical transmission facilities, the guidelines shall prevail.

(c) The guidelines adopted pursuant to this section shall supersede the commission’s Guidelines for Energy Project Applications Requiring CEQA Compliance: Pre-filing and Proponent’s Environmental Assessments (November 2019), unless the guidelines adopted pursuant to this section specify otherwise.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, guidelines adopted pursuant to this section are exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) For purposes of this section, “electrical transmission facilities” means electrical generation facilities, transmission, power, and distribution line facilities, and substations, as described in commission General Order No. 131-D, as it may be amended from
 time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 299, Sec. 2.   (AB 551)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.5.

In issuing a certificate of convenience and necessity for additional natural gas pipeline capacity proposed for construction within this state, the commission shall consider the state’s need to provide sufficient and competitively priced natural gas supplies for both present and anticipated future residential, industrial, commercial, and utility demand. When it finds that it is in the state’s best interests to do so, the commission shall expeditiously issue certificates of convenience and necessity for those additional natural gas pipeline capacity projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 896, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

Every electrical and every gas corporation submitting an application to the commission for a certificate authorizing the new construction of any electric plant, line, or extension, or gas plant, line, or extension, not subject to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code, shall include all of the following information in the application in addition to any other required information:

(a) Preliminary engineering and design information on the project. The design information provided for thermal electric plants shall include preliminary
 data regarding the operating characteristics of the proposed plant, including, but not limited to, the annual capacity factor, availability factor, and the heat rate for each year of the useful life of the plant, line, or extension.

(b) A project implementation plan showing how the project would be contracted for and constructed. This plan shall show how all major tasks would be integrated and shall include a timetable identifying the design, construction, completion, and operation dates for each major component of the plant, line, or extension.

(c) An appropriate cost estimate, including preliminary estimates of the costs of financing, construction, and operation, including fuel, maintenance, and dismantling or inactivation after the useful life of the plant, line, or extension.

(d) A cost analysis comparing the
 project with any feasible alternative sources of power. The corporation shall demonstrate the financial impact of the plant, line, or extension construction on the corporation’s ratepayers, stockholders, and on the cost of the corporation’s borrowed capital. The cost analyses shall be performed for the projected useful life of the plant, line, or extension, including dismantling or inactivation after the useful life of the plant, line, or extension.

(e) A design and construction management and cost control plan which indicates the contractual and working responsibilities and interrelationships between the corporation’s management and other major parties involved in the project. This plan shall also include a construction progress information system and specific cost controls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1253, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.5.

Every electrical and gas corporation submitting an application to the commission for a certificate authorizing the new construction of an electric plant, line, or extension, or gas plant, line, or extension, which is subject to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code, shall include in the application the information specified in subdivisions (b), (c), and (e) of Section 1003, in addition to any other required information. The corporation may also include in the application any other information specified in Section 1003.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1253, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.

Before any certificate may issue, under this article, a certified copy of its articles of incorporation or charter, if the applicant is a corporation, shall be filed in the office of the commission. Every applicant for a certificate shall file in the office of the commission such evidence as is required by the commission to show that the applicant has received the required consent, franchise, or permit of the proper county, city and county, city, or other public authority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.

(a) The commission may, with or without hearing, issue the certificate as prayed for, or refuse to issue it, or issue it for the construction of a portion only of the contemplated street railroad line, plant, or system, or extension thereof, or for the partial exercise only of the right or privilege, and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by the certificate such terms and conditions, including provisions for the acquisition by the public of the franchise or permit and all rights acquired thereunder and all works constructed or maintained by authority thereof, as in its judgment the public convenience and necessity require;
 provided, however, upon timely application for a hearing by any person entitled to be heard thereat, the commission, before issuing or refusing to issue the certificate, shall hold a hearing thereon.

(b) When the commission issues a certificate for the new construction of a gas or electric plant, line, or extension, the certificate shall specify the operating and cost characteristics of the plant, line, or extension, including, but not limited to, the size, capacity, cost, and all other characteristics of the plant, line, or extension which are specified in the information which the gas and electrical corporations are required to submit, pursuant to Section 1003 or 1003. 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1253, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.1.

(a) The commission shall issue a decision on an application for a certificate within 18 months of the date of filing of the completed application, when all of the following are true:

(1) The application is for a certificate for building or upgrading an electrical transmission line that the commission finds necessary to provide transmission to load centers for electricity generated in a high priority
 renewable energy zone or is reasonably necessary to facilitate achievement of the renewables portfolio standard established in Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3.

(2) The commission has considered all of the following:

(A) The utilization of rights-of-way by upgrading existing transmission facilities instead of building new transmission facilities, where technically and economically justifiable.

(B) The expansion of existing rights-of-way, if technically and economically feasible, when construction of new transmission lines is required.

(C) The creation of new rights-of-way when justified by environmental, technical, and economic reasons.

(D) The availability of
 cost-effective alternatives to transmission, such as energy efficiency measures and distributed generation.

(3) The commission has not expressly found any of the following:

(A) That the investment is not reasonable and necessary to maintain or enhance reliability of the transmission grid.

(B) That the building or upgrading of the electrical transmission line will not maintain or enhance efficient use of the transmission grid.

(C) That the transmission line fails to meet other applicable standards and requirements for approval and construction.

(b) An extension of time may be granted by the commission if it finds the extension is necessary for completion of review pursuant to the California
 Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 33.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective December 10, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.5.

(a) Whenever the commission issues to an electrical or gas corporation a certificate authorizing the new construction of any addition to or extension of the corporation’s plant estimated to cost greater than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), the commission shall specify in the certificate a maximum cost determined to be reasonable and prudent for the facility. The commission shall determine the maximum cost using an estimate of the anticipated construction cost, taking into consideration the design of the project, the expected duration of construction, an estimate of the effects of economic inflation, and any known engineering
 difficulties associated with the project.

(b) After the certificate has been issued, the corporation may apply to the commission for an increase in the maximum cost specified in the certificate. The commission may authorize an increase in the specified maximum cost if it finds and determines that the cost has in fact increased and that the present or future public convenience and necessity require construction of the project at the increased cost; otherwise, it shall deny the application.

(c) After construction has commenced, the corporation may apply to the commission for authorization to discontinue construction and recover those costs which were reasonably and prudently incurred. After a showing to the satisfaction of the commission that the present or future public convenience and necessity no longer require the completion of construction of the project, the commission may
 authorize discontinuance of construction and the recovery of those construction costs which were reasonable and prudent.

(d) In any decision establishing rates for an electrical or gas corporation reflecting the reasonable and prudent costs of the new construction of any addition to or extension of the corporation’s plant, when the commission has found and determined that the addition or extension is used and useful, the commission shall consider whether or not the actual costs of construction are within the maximum cost specified by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 926, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.

When a complaint has been filed with the commission alleging that a public utility of the class specified in Section 1001 is engaged or is about to engage in construction work without having secured from the commission a certificate of public convenience and necessity as required by this article, the commission may, with or without notice, make its order requiring the public utility complained of to cease and desist from such construction until the commission makes and files its decision on the complaint or until the further order of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.5.

The commission may, after notice and hearing, prior to authorizing any water or sewer system corporation having annual gross operating revenues under two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to construct, operate, acquire, expand, or improve its line, plant, or system, prescribe, as a condition to granting such authority, that the corporation file with the commission a bond with sufficient sureties, subject to approval of the commission, in a reasonable amount not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) payable to the commission and conditioned on the corporation’s furnishing adequate and sufficient service within its service area. The commission may,
 after notice and hearing, declare all or any part of the bond forfeited after finding that the corporation has willfully failed to furnish adequate and sufficient service without just cause or excuse and that such failure has continued for an unreasonable duration. Such bond shall further provide for payment to the commission of the amount of any penalty assessed against the corporation pursuant to Section 2107. The commission may, upon petition by a water or sewer system corporation, for good cause, reduce the amount or eliminate the requirement of any bond which it has required to be filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1078, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1007.

No corporation or person shall begin to operate or cause to be operated any vessel for the transportation of persons or property, for compensation, between points in this state, without first having obtained from the commission a certificate declaring that public convenience and necessity require such operation, but no such certificate shall be required as to termini between which any such corporation or person is lawfully operating vessels in good faith under this part as it existed prior to August 17, 1923, under tariffs and schedules of such corporations or persons, lawfully on file with the commission. Every applicant for such a certificate shall file in the office of the
 commission application and evidence in the form required by the commission. The commission may, with or without hearing, issue the certificate as prayed for, or refuse to issue it, or issue it for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, or issue it for operation between certain points only, and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by the certificate such terms and conditions as, in its judgment, the public convenience and necessity require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

1007.5.

The commission, in the exercise of the jurisdiction conferred upon it by the Constitution of the state and by this part, and consistent with Section 9 of Article I of the California Constitution and Section 10 of Article I of the United States Constitution, may grant certificates of public convenience and necessity, make decisions and orders, and prescribe rules affecting vessel common carriers notwithstanding the provisions of any ordinance, permit, or franchise of any city, county, or other political subdivision of this state, and in the case of conflict
 between any certificate, decision, order, or rule of the commission and any ordinance, permit, or franchise, the certificate, decision, order, or rule of the commission shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1008.

Any municipal corporation or port district operating or maintaining a port may apply to the commission for the issuance of a certificate of convenience and necessity to require any person or corporation operating vessels between points in this State, to serve that port. The commission may, after hearing, issue the certificate as prayed for, or refuse to issue it, or issue it for the partial exercise of the rights granted by any such certificate, upon such terms and conditions as in its judgment the public convenience and necessity require, and upon making the order the person or corporation to which the certificate is issued, shall be compelled to perform the
 service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.

Any right, privilege, franchise, or permit held, owned or obtained by any person or corporation for the operation of vessels between points in this State may be sold, assigned, leased, transferred, or inherited as other property, only upon authorization by the commission. The commission may at any time for a good cause suspend, and upon notice to the grantee of any certificate or operative right and opportunity to be heard revoke, alter, or amend any certificate or operative right issued or existing under the provisions of Sections 1007 or 1008.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1011.

The provisions of this article are enacted under the State’s reserved power over public utilities or corporations, or both, as the case may be, for the purpose of acting on the right of the grantee of a public utility franchise granted by a city, county, or city and county, to exercise rights thereunder, and not for the purpose of acting on the right of any city or city and county to grant any such franchise. The Legislature hereby declares that the provisions of this article shall remain in full force and effect concurrently with the right of any city or city and county to grant franchises for public utilities upon the terms and conditions and in the manner prescribed by
 law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

1013.

(a) The commission may by rule or order, partially or completely exempt certain telecommunications services offered by telephone and telegraph corporations from the certification requirements of Section 1001 and instead subject them to registration as the commission may determine. Telephone corporations that the commission determines have monopoly power or market power in a relevant market or markets shall have a certificate of public convenience and necessity and shall not be eligible for designation as registered telephone corporations. A
 telephone corporation that has been found not to have monopoly power or market power in a relevant market or markets by the commission shall be eligible for registration subject to the approval of the commission. A telephone corporation operating in this state shall either have a certificate of public convenience and necessity or be registered under this section or be a telephone corporation authorized to operate in California without a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

(b) Registered telephone corporations qualifying under this section shall maintain an active registration with the commission at all times and comply with commission rules and regulations established for registered telephone corporations qualifying under this section.

(c) The registration of registered telephone corporations qualifying under this section shall be on a form prescribed by the
 commission and shall contain any information the commission may by rule or order require, but shall include as a minimum the name and address of the telephone corporation’s registered agent, if any, the name, address, and title of each officer or director, and a description of the telecommunications services it offers or intends to offer.

(d) Prior to designating any telephone corporation for registration status, the commission shall adopt rules to do both of the following:

(1) Verify the financial viability of the corporation.

(2) Verify that the officers of the corporation have no prior history of committing fraud on the public.

(e) The commission shall require as a precondition to registration the procurement of a performance bond sufficient to cover
 taxes or fees, or both, collected from customers and held for remittance and advances or deposits the telecommunications company may collect from its customers, or order that those advances or deposits be held in escrow or trust.

(f) The commission may require, as a precondition to registration, the procurement of a performance bond sufficient to facilitate the collection of fines, penalties, and restitution related to enforcement actions that can be taken against a telecommunications company.

(g) The commission may, with or without a hearing, grant a telephone corporation registration status and an exemption from the certification requirements of Section 1001. However, upon timely application, any person entitled to be heard may file a protest on whether a telephone corporation should be eligible for registration status and the granting of an exemption from the certification
 requirement of Section 1001. Upon a determination that the protest has presented a prima facie case that a telephone corporation should not be granted registration status and an exemption from Section 1001, a hearing shall be held.

(h) The commission, after notice and a hearing if requested, may cancel, revoke, or suspend the registration of any telephone corporation upon any of the following grounds:

(1) The corporation does not provide the information required by this article.

(2) The corporation fails to provide or maintain a performance bond.

(3) The corporation conducts any illegal telephone operations.

(4) The corporation violates any of the applicable provisions of this code or of
 any regulations issued thereunder.

(5) The corporation violates any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement established by the commission under this code.

(6) The corporation fails to pay any fee or fine imposed upon the utility under this code.

(7) The corporation files a false statement to the commission.

(8) The corporation knowingly defrauds a customer.

(i) As an alternative to the cancellation, revocation, or suspension of a registration, the commission, after notice and a hearing, may impose upon the holder of the registration a fine in an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each offense, and order reparations and restitution to
 customers for each offense.

(j) Every violation of this section or any part of any order, decision, decree, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission, by any telephone corporation or person is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation each day’s continuance thereof shall be a separate and distinct offense.

(k) In construing and enforcing this section relating to penalties, the act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or employee of any registered telephone corporation qualifying under this section acting within the scope of his or her official duties or employment, shall in every case be the act, omission, or failure of the corporation. The commission may assess interest to commence upon the day the payment is delinquent. All fines, assessments, and interest collected shall be deposited at least once each month in the General
 Fund.

(l) Actions to enforce the decision of the commission ordering the payment of fines, reparations, or restitution under this section shall be brought in the name of the people of the State of California, in the superior court of the county, or city and county, in which the corporation complained of, if any, has its principal place of business, or in which the person, if any, complained of, resides or in which the commission has offices. The enforcement of a commission decision or order under this section shall be commenced and prosecuted to final judgment by the attorney of the commission.

 (m) The provisions of this section do not apply to commercial mobile radio service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 552, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Passenger Stage Corporations [1031. - 1046.]

1031.

(a) No passenger stage corporation shall operate or cause to be operated any passenger stage over any public highway in this state without first having obtained from the commission a certificate declaring that public convenience and necessity require such operation, but no such certificate shall be required of any passenger stage corporation as to the fixed termini between which, or the route over which, it was actually operating in good faith on July 29, 1927, in compliance with the provisions of Chapter 213, Statutes of 1917, nor shall any
 such certificate be required of any person or corporation who on January 1, 1927, was operating, or during the calendar year 1926 had operated a seasonal service of not less than three consecutive months’ duration, sightseeing buses on a continuous sightseeing trip with one terminus only. Any right, privilege, franchise, or permit held, owned, or obtained by any passenger stage corporation may be sold, assigned, leased, mortgaged, transferred, inherited, or otherwise encumbered as other property, only upon authorization by the commission.

(b) For purposes of this section, “public convenience and necessity,” as it affects applications for passenger stage corporation certificates, means that the applicant has met the criteria for issuance of a certificate specified in Section 1032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 694, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1031.5.

The commission shall not issue or authorize the transfer of any certificate under this article to any person, firm, or corporation or to any officer or director of the firm, corporation, or other entity against whom a final judgment has been entered and whose name has been transmitted to the commission pursuant to Section 3716.4 of the Labor Code, unless that judgment has been satisfied or has been discharged in accordance with the bankruptcy laws of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1071, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1032.
